New York, session 2025-2026, A2211.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subsection (b) of section 3458 of the insurance law, as 2 amended by chapter 161 of the laws of 2022, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 (b) Subject to the requirements of this section, any notice to a party 5 or any other document required under this chapter or paragraph (a) of 6 subdivision five of section fifty-four of the workers' compensation law 7 in a property/casualty insurance transaction or that is to serve as 8 evidence of property/casualty insurance coverage may be delivered by 9 electronic means so long as it meets the requirements of article three 10 of the state technology law. Where this chapter requires that notice be 11 mailed or delivered to an address shown in the policy, the notice may be 12 delivered by electronic means to an electronic address not specified in 13 the policy. 14 § 2. Paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 54 of the workers' 15 compensation law is amended by adding a new undesignated paragraph to 16 read as follows: 17 An electronic notice that complies with section three thousand four 18 hundred fifty-eight of the insurance law shall be sufficient for the 19 purposes of this section. 20 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03855-01-5